District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Closing of a Public Alley in Square 3524, S.O. 23-06402, Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law
4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-201.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the portion of the public
alley in Square 3524, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 23-06402, is unnecessary
for alley purposes and orders it closed, with title to the land to vest as shown on the Surveyor’s
plat.
(b) The ordering of the alley closure in subsection (a) of this section is contingent upon
the satisfaction of the conditions set forth by the District Department of Transportation in the
official file for S.O. 23-06402.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2